Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0276.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 Sec. 503d. (1) The department may require an individual to have a base license, mentored youth license, or all-species fishing license or to pay a recreation passport fee to use a state-owned shooting range. (2) The shooting and education fund is created in the state treasury. (3) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the fund interest and earnings from fund investments. (4) Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the fund and does not lapse to the general fund. (5) The department is the administrator of the fund for auditing purposes. (6) The department shall expend money from the fund, on appropriation, for the operation and maintenance of state-owned shooting ranges and the administration of shooting education programs. (7) As used in this section: (a) "Fund" means the shooting and education fund created in 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 subsection (2). (b) "Recreation passport fee" means that term as defined in section 2001. Sec. 40111a. (1) The commission, after consultation with the commission of agriculture and rural development, shall issue in the manner provided in section 40113a an order concerning deer and elk feeding in this state. (2) Any order issued by the commission banning deer and elk baiting in this state in effect on October 1, 2025 is no longer in effect beginning April 1, 2026. (3) (2) As used in this section, "deer and elk feeding" means the depositing, distributing, or tending of feed in an area frequented by wild, free-ranging white-tailed deer and elk to prevent them from starving or for recreational viewing. Deer and elk feeding does not include any of the following: (a) Baiting to take game as provided by an order of the commission under section 40113a. (b) The scattering of feed solely as the result of normal logging practices or normal agricultural practices. (c) The storage or use of feed for agricultural purposes if 1 or more of the following apply: (i) The area is occupied by livestock actively consuming the feed on a daily basis. (ii) The feed is covered to deter wild, free-ranging white-tailed deer and elk from gaining access to the feed or is being used on a daily basis. (iii) The feed is in a storage facility or is stored in a manner that is consistent with normal agricultural practices. (d) Feeding wild birds or other wildlife if done in such a 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 manner as to exclude wild, free-ranging white-tailed deer and elk from gaining access to the feed. Sec. 43520. (1) Subject to other requirements of this part, the department may issue a hunting license to an adult who has a developmental disability, has a guardian appointed under chapter 6 of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1600 to 330.1644, and is unable to obtain certification of completion of training in hunter safety, or to a minor child if all of the following requirements are met: (a) A parent or guardian of the individual applies for the license on behalf of the individual. (b) The parent or guardian represents that the requirements of section 43517, as applicable, will be complied with. (c) The license fee is paid. (2) An individual born after January 1, 1960 shall not purchase or attempt to purchase a hunting license, unless the individual presents proof of previous hunting experience in the form of a hunting license issued by this state, another state, a province of Canada, or another country or presents a certification of completion of training in hunter safety issued to the individual by this state, another state, a province of Canada, or another country. If an applicant for a hunting license does not have proof of such a previous license or a certification of completion of training in hunter safety, a person authorized to sell hunting licenses may issue a hunting license if the applicant submits a signed affidavit stating that the applicant has completed a course in hunter safety or that the applicant possessed such a hunting license previously. The person selling a hunting license shall record as specified by the department the form of proof of the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 previous hunting experience or certification of completion of hunter safety training presented by the applicant. This subsection does not apply to the issuance of an apprentice license, or mentored hunting license. An apprentice license, mentored hunting license, or the equivalent does not satisfy the requirements of this subsection concerning proof of previous hunting experience. (3) An individual who does not meet the requirements of subsection (2) may obtain an apprentice license for the same price as the corresponding regular license that the individual would otherwise be qualified to obtain. An individual 17 years old or older shall not hunt game under an apprentice license unless another individual at least 21 years old who possesses a license, other than an apprentice license, to hunt that game accompanies that apprentice licensee and does not accompany more than 1 other apprentice licensee. For the purposes of this subsection and section 43517(1)(b), an individual shall not go along with more than 2 apprentice licensees of any age for the purpose of accompanying those apprentice licensees while those apprentice licensees are hunting. If an individual has represented to an apprentice licensee or, if the apprentice licensee is a minor child, to the apprentice licensee's parent or guardian that the individual would accompany the apprentice licensee for the purposes of this subsection, the individual shall not go along with the apprentice licensee while the apprentice licensee is hunting unless the individual actually accompanies the apprentice licensee and possesses a license, other than an apprentice license, to hunt the same game as the apprentice licensee. An individual is not eligible to obtain a specific type of apprentice license, such as a deer license, a base license, or a turkey license, for more than 2 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 license years. An apprentice license must be distinguished from a license other than an apprentice license by a notation or other means. (4) Only a minor who is less than 10 years old, a minor child with a developmental disability, or an adult who has a developmental disability and a guardian appointed under chapter 6 of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1600 to 330.1644, may obtain a mentored hunting license. A minor who is less than 10 years old, a minor child with a developmental disability, or an adult who has a developmental disability and a guardian appointed under chapter 6 of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1600 to 330.1644, shall not hunt game under a mentored hunting license unless that individual complies with all requirements of the mentored hunting program established by the commission under section 43517. (5) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the fee for a mentored hunting license is $7.50. $10.00. A mentored hunting license is free for an individual with a developmental disability. A mentored hunting license includes all of the privileges conferred by all of the following: (a) Base license. (b) Deer license. (c) All-species fishing license. (d) Spring wild turkey hunting license and fall wild turkey hunting license. (e) Fur harvester's license. (6) An individual who purchases a mentored hunting license may apply for or purchase additional licenses pursuant to in accordance with current regulations, including, but not limited to, all of the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 following: (a) Antlerless deer licenses under section 43527a. (b) A bear hunting license under section 43528. (c) An elk hunting license under section 43529. (7) An individual hunting with a license purchased under subsection (6) must comply with all requirements of the mentored hunting program established by the commission under section 43517. (8) By September 1, 2023 and every 4 years after that date, the department shall submit a report to the standing committees of the senate and house of representatives with primary responsibility for conservation and outdoor recreation issues evaluating whether the fee revenue received by the department from mentored hunting licenses under subsection (5) is adequate to administer the mentored hunting program. (9) As used in this section, "developmental disability" means that term as defined in section 100a of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1100a. Sec. 43521. Notwithstanding any other section of this part, the department commission may discount the price of a license for the following purposes: (a) For marketing purposes to increase participation in hunting and fishing activities. (b) The price of any license or application fee may be discounted or eliminated to achieve a harvest or management objective for that species. Sec. 43522. If a person an individual applying for a license or permit under this part does not possess a Michigan driver license or other identification, the department shall issue a sportcard. A person authorized by the department to issue licenses 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 shall charge a $1.00 $2.00 fee for each sportcard that he or she the person issues. The authorized person shall forward the required form and the fee collected pursuant to under this section to the department. The department shall issue a license and a sportcard provided for in this part if the applicant satisfies the license requirements and pays the license fees. Sec. 43523a. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this part, an individual shall not hunt small game, unless the individual possesses a current base license. A base license authorizes the individual named in the license to hunt for small game, except for animals or birds that require a special license. (2) If authorized in an order issued under part 401, an individual who possesses a current base license may take specified fur-bearing animals by means other than trapping during the open season for hunting these fur-bearing animals. However, an individual who goes on a bobcat hunt with a licensed hunter is not required to possess a base license if the individual does not carry a firearm, bow, or crossbow and does not own dogs used to chase or locate a bobcat during the hunt. (3) The fee for a base license is as follows: (a) Subject to subdivision (b), for For a resident, $10.00.$15.00. (b) For a resident minor child or nonresident minor child, $5.00. (b) (c) Subject to subdivision (b), for For a nonresident, $150.00.$200.00. (4) A base license is void between the hours of 1/2 hour after sunset and 1/2 hour before sunrise with the exception of coyote hunting. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (5) A nonresident may purchase a limited nonresident small game license entitling that individual to hunt for a 7-day period all species of small game that are available to hunt under a nonresident base license. The fee for a 7-day limited nonresident small game license is $80.00. $125.00. Except for the purchase of a waterfowl hunting license under section 43525b, the purchase of a 7-day limited nonresident small game license does not entitle the holder to purchase any additional licenses. (6) Beginning March 1, 2018, a A nonresident may purchase a 3-day limited nonresident small game license entitling that individual to hunt for a 3-day period all species of small game that are available to hunt under a nonresident base license. The fee for a 3-day limited nonresident small game license is $50.00. $80.00. Except for the purchase of a waterfowl hunting license issued under section 43525b, the purchase of a 3-day limited nonresident small game license does not entitle the holder to purchase any additional licenses. (7) Not later than March 1, 2018, the The department shall develop an electronic license that allows an individual to display an electronic copy of his or her the individual's base license using an electronic device. Sec. 43523b. (1) Beginning March 1, 2014, the The fee for a resident combination hunt and fish license is $75.00 $100.00 and shall include includes all of the privileges conferred by all of the following in accordance with current regulations: (a) Resident A resident base license. (b) Two deer licenses. (c) All-species An all-species fishing license. (2) Beginning March 1, 2014, the The fee for a nonresident 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 combination hunt and fish license, where authorized by the department, is $265.00 $355.00 and shall include includes all of the privileges conferred by all of the following in accordance with current regulation: (a) Nonresident A nonresident base license. (b) Two deer licenses. (c) All-species An all-species fishing license. (3) The department may issue orders under part 401 designating the kind of deer that may be taken and the geographic area in which any license issued under this section is valid, when advisable in managing deer. (4) The fee for a resident complete license is $150.00 and includes all of the privileges conferred by all of the following in accordance with current regulations: (a) A resident base license. (b) Two deer licenses. (c) One antlerless deer license. (d) An all-species fishing license. (e) A spring and fall wild turkey hunting license. (f) A waterfowl hunting license. (g) A pheasant hunting license. (h) A fur harvester's license. (5) The fee for a nonresident complete license is $450.00 and includes all of the privileges conferred by all of the following in accordance with current regulations: (a) A nonresident base license. (b) Two deer licenses. (c) One antlerless deer license. (d) An all-species fishing license. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (e) A spring and fall wild turkey hunting license. (f) A waterfowl hunting license. (g) A pheasant hunting license. (h) A fur harvester's license. (6) From the fees collected under subsection (4), the department shall do all of the following: (a) Deposit $15.00 in the cold-water subaccount created in section 43532. (b) Use $12.00 as provided in section 43524(5). (c) Use $16.00 as provided in section 43525b(4)(a) to (c). (d) Deposit $25.00 into the pheasant subaccount created in section 43525c. (e) Use $1.50 as provided in section 43554. (7) From the fees collected under subsection (5), the department shall do all of the following: (a) Deposit $15.00 in the cold-water subaccount created in section 43532. (b) Use $12.00 as provided in section 43524(5). (c) Use $16.00 as provided in section 43525b(4)(a) to (c). (d) Deposit $25.00 into the pheasant subaccount created in section 43525c. (e) Use $1.50 as provided in section 43554. Sec. 43524. (1) An individual shall not hunt wild turkey without a wild turkey hunting license. The fee for a resident wild turkey hunting license is $15.00. The fee for a nonresident wild turkey hunting license is $69.00. Subject to the requirements of section 40113a, the commission may issue an order requiring that all applications for wild turkey hunting licenses, or applications for wild turkey hunting licenses for certain geographic areas, be 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 entered into a lottery designed and run by the department. An individual selected in a lottery, upon meeting the requirements of this part, is authorized to purchase a wild turkey hunting license. The license shall be issued for a specified hunting period and confers upon the holder of the license the right to hunt wild turkeys. (2) The department may charge a nonrefundable application fee not to exceed $4.00 for each application for a wild turkey hunting license that is entered into a lottery under subsection (1). (3) From fees collected under subsection (1) or (2), the following amounts shall be used for scientific research, biological survey work on wild turkeys, creation and management of wild turkey habitat on state land, national forestland, and private land, annual wild turkey hunter surveys, disease testing for wild turkeys suspected of having a disease and voluntarily submitted to the department of natural resources, and other wild turkey management in this state: (a) Resident wild turkey hunting license $ 9.50 (b) Nonresident wild turkey hunting license $ 50.00 (c) Senior wild turkey hunting license $ 1.00 (d) Wild turkey hunting application amount of application fee, if any, but not more than $ 3.00. (2) (4) The department shall, to the extent possible, use the money from subsection (3) (5) to create and manage wild turkey habitat on state forestland, state game areas, national forestland, and private land, where appropriate. The department shall, before January 1 of each year, provide to the standing committees in the senate and house of representatives that primarily consider issues 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 relating to natural resources a report detailing the expenditures for the prior year under subsection (3).(5). (3) (5) Beginning March 1, 2014, only Only an individual holding a valid base license is eligible to purchase a wild turkey hunting license, pursuant to in accordance with current regulations. The fee for a wild turkey hunting license is $15.00.$18.00. (4) (6) Beginning March 1, 2014, the The department may charge a nonrefundable application fee not to exceed $5.00 $6.00 for each application for a wild turkey hunting license that is entered into a lottery under subsection (1). (5) (7) Beginning March 1, 2014, from From fees collected under subsection (5) or (6), (3) or (4), the following amounts shall must be used for scientific research, biological survey work on wild turkeys, creation and management of wild turkey habitat on state land, national forestland, and private land, annual wild turkey hunter surveys, disease testing for wild turkeys suspected of having a disease and voluntarily submitted to the department of natural resources, and other wild turkey management in this state: (a) Wild turkey hunting license $ 9.5012.00 (b) Senior wild turkey hunting license $ 1.002.00 (c) Wild turkey hunting application amount of application fee, if any, but not more than $ 3.00.5.00 Sec. 43525b. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this part, an individual 16 years of age or older shall not hunt waterfowl without a current waterfowl hunting license issued by this state. The annual license requirement is in addition to the requirements 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 for a base license and federal migratory bird hunting stamp. The fee for the a waterfowl hunting license is $12.00.$18.00. (2) If issued as a stamp, a waterfowl hunting license shall must be affixed to the base license of the individual and signed across the face of the stamp by the individual to whom it is issued. (3) A collector may purchase a waterfowl hunting license, if it is issued as a stamp, without being required to place it on a base license, sign across its face, or provide proof of competency under section 43520(2). However, a license described in this subsection is not valid for hunting waterfowl. (4) From the fee collected for each waterfowl hunting license, the department shall use the following amounts: (a) $9.00 shall $12.00 from each waterfowl hunting license must be used to acquire, restore, or enhance wetlands and other lands to be managed for the benefit of waterfowl. Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, not more than 0.25% of the money under this subdivision shall be used to acquire lands. However, if all of the money appropriated from the natural resources trust fund for eco-region acquisition carried over from previous fiscal years is spent, then the 0.25% limitation under this subdivision does not apply. The department shall not acquire land under this subdivision until that acquisition is approved by the joint capital outlay subcommittee. (b) $1.93 shall $3.00 from each waterfowl hunting license must be used to operate, maintain, and develop managed waterfowl areas in this state. (c) $1.00 from each waterfowl hunting license to match federal wetland investment programs. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (d) (c) The remaining amount shall must be retained under section 43541 or used for administration of this part. (5) Not later than March 1, 2018, the The department shall develop an electronic license that allows an individual to display an electronic copy of his or her the individual's Michigan waterfowl hunting license using an electronic device. Sec. 43525c. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, an individual 18 years of age or older shall not hunt pheasants without a current annual pheasant hunting license issued by this state. The annual pheasant hunting license requirement is in addition to the requirements for a base license. The fee for the a pheasant hunting license is $25.00. The following individuals are not required to obtain an annual pheasant hunting license under this section: (a) An individual only hunting pheasants at a game bird hunting preserve licensed under part 417. (b) An individual hunting pheasants on private land, except for individuals hunting on land enrolled in the hunting access program. (c) An individual hunting pheasants on public land in the Upper Peninsula. (d) An individual who holds a lifetime small game license, lifetime sportsperson's license, or a comprehensive lifetime hunting and fishing license issued under section 44102. (2) If issued as a stamp, a pheasant hunting license must be affixed to the base license of the individual and signed across the face of the stamp by the individual to whom it is issued. (3) A collector may purchase a pheasant hunting license, if it is issued as a stamp, without being required to place it on a base 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 license, sign across its face, or provide proof of competency under section 43520(2). However, a license described in this subsection is not valid for hunting pheasants. (4) Except as provided in sections 43541 and 43555, the department shall deposit the fee collected for each pheasant hunting license in the pheasant subaccount of the game and fish protection account for the purposes stated in subsection (5). (5) The pheasant subaccount is created in the game and fish protection account. The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the subaccount. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the subaccount. The state treasurer shall credit to the subaccount interest and earnings from subaccount investments. Money in the subaccount at the close of the fiscal year remains in the subaccount and does not lapse to the game and fish protection account or the general fund. Money in the subaccount on January 1, 2026 is transferred to the game and fish protection account. The department is the administrator of the subaccount for auditing purposes. The department shall expend money from the subaccount, upon on appropriation, only for costs associated with the purchase and release of live pheasants on state-owned land suitable for pheasants. (6) This section is repealed effective January 1, 2026. Sec. 43527a. (1) Beginning March 1, 2014, only Only an individual holding a valid base license is eligible to purchase a deer license, or an antlerless deer license, pursuant to in accordance with current regulations. The fee for a deer license or an antlerless deer license is $20.00.$25.00. (2) Beginning March 1, 2014, the The department shall charge a nonrefundable application fee not to exceed $5.00 $6.00 for each 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 individual who applies for an antlerless deer license. The department shall provide a wildlife management discount on all antlerless deer licenses equal to an 80% discount from the cost of a deer license. (3) The department may issue a kill tag with or as part of each deer license. The kill tag shall must bear the license number. The kill tag may also include space for other pertinent information required by the department. The kill tag, if issued, is part of the license. (4) Where authorized by the department, a resident may purchase a second deer license for the fee assessed under this subsection for the deer license for which that individual is eligible. However, a senior license discount is not available for the purchase of a second deer license. Where authorized by the department, a nonresident may purchase an additional deer license or antlerless deer license under this section for $170.00. $225.00. The department may issue orders under part 401 designating the kind of deer that may be taken and the geographic area in which any license issued under this section is valid, when advisable in managing deer. The commission may issue orders under section 40113a requiring an individual to take an antlerless deer before that individual may take a second antlered deer. Sec. 43527b. The department may issue deer management assistance permits pursuant to current regulations. The fee for a deer management assistance permit is $5.00. The department shall provide a wildlife management discount on all antlerless deer management assistance permits equal to an 80% discount from the cost of a deer management assistance permit. Sec. 43528. (1) An individual shall not hunt bear unless the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 individual possesses a bear hunting license. However, an Only an individual holding a valid base license is eligible to purchase a bear hunting license, in accordance with current regulations. An individual who goes on a bear hunt with a licensed hunter is not required to possess a bear hunting license if the individual does not carry a firearm, bow, or crossbow and does not own dogs used to chase or locate bear during the hunt. Beginning March 1, 2014, only an individual holding a valid base license is eligible to purchase a bear hunting license, pursuant to current regulations. (2) The fee for a resident bear hunting license is $15.00. $30.00. The fee for a nonresident bear hunting license is $150.00. $180.00. Beginning March 1, 2014, the fee for a bear hunting license is $25.00. (3) The department may issue a kill tag with, or as a part of, a bear hunting license. The kill tag shall must bear the license number. The kill tag may also include space for other pertinent information required by the department. The kill tag, if issued, is part of the license. (4) In addition to the license fees in subsection (2), the department shall charge a nonrefundable application fee not to exceed $4.00 for each individual who applies for a bear hunting license. Beginning March 1, 2014, in In addition to the license fees in subsection (2), the department shall charge a nonrefundable application fee not to exceed $5.00 $6.00 for each individual who applies for a bear hunting license. (5) Beginning March 1, 2014, the The following individuals chasing or locating bear with dogs during the open season for that game and who hold a valid base license are eligible for the purchase of a bear participation license for a fee of 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 $15.00:$30.00: (a) Any individual possessing a firearm, crossbow, or bow and arrow. (b) The owner, when present, of any dog chasing or locating bear. Sec. 43528a. (1) A resident shall not hunt moose without a moose hunting license. Beginning March 1, 2014, only Only a resident holding a valid base license is eligible to purchase a moose hunting license, pursuant to in accordance with current regulations. The fee for a moose hunting license is $100.00. The department may establish a nonrefundable application fee not to exceed $4.00 $6.00 for each individual who applies for a moose hunting license. Beginning March 1, 2014, the department may establish a nonrefundable application fee not to exceed $5.00 for each individual who applies for a moose hunting license. (2) The department may issue a kill tag with, or as part of, a moose hunting license. The kill tag shall must bear the license number. The kill tag may also include space for other pertinent information required by the department. The kill tag, if issued, is part of the license. Sec. 43528b. (1) An individual shall not hunt wolf without a wolf hunting license. Beginning March 1, 2014, only Only an individual holding a valid base license is eligible to purchase a wolf hunting license. The fee for a resident wolf hunting license is $100.00. The fee for a nonresident wolf hunting license is $500.00. The department may establish a nonrefundable application fee not to exceed $4.00 $6.00 for each individual who applies for a wolf hunting license. Beginning March 1, 2014, the department may establish a nonrefundable application fee not to exceed $5.00 for 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 each individual who applies for a wolf hunting license. (2) The department may issue a kill tag with, or as part of, a wolf hunting license. The kill tag shall must bear the license number. The kill tag may also include space for other pertinent information required by the department. The kill tag, if issued, is part of the license. Sec. 43529. (1) A resident shall not hunt elk during the elk season without an elk hunting license. Beginning March 1, 2014, only Only a resident holding a valid base license is eligible to purchase an elk hunting license, pursuant to in accordance with current regulations. The fee for an elk hunting license is $100.00. The department may establish a nonrefundable application fee not to exceed $4.00 for each individual who applies for an elk hunting license. Beginning March 1, 2014, the $125.00. The department may establish a nonrefundable application fee not to exceed $5.00 $6.00 for each individual who applies for an elk hunting license. (2) The department may issue a kill tag with, or as a part of, an elk hunting license. The kill tag shall must bear the license number. The kill tag may also include space for other pertinent information required by the department. The kill tag, if issued, is part of the license. Sec. 43531. (1) Except as otherwise provided in section 43523(2) or section 43523a(2), an individual shall not trap or hunt fur-bearing animals unless the individual possesses a fur harvester's license. An individual shall not trap or hunt a bobcat unless the individual possesses a bobcat kill tag. However, an individual who goes on a bobcat hunt with a licensed hunter is not required to possess a fur harvester's license if the individual does not carry a firearm, bow, or crossbow and does not own dogs 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 used to chase or locate a bobcat during the hunt. (2) The fee for a resident fur harvester's license is $15.00. The fee for a fur harvester's license for a resident or nonresident minor child 10 years old or older shall be discounted 50% from the cost of the resident fur harvester's license. (3) Until March 1, 2014, the department may issue a nonresident fur harvester's license to a nonresident of this state if the state, province, or country in which the nonresident applicant resides allows residents of this state to obtain equivalent hunting and trapping privileges in that state, province, or country. The fee for an eligible nonresident fur harvester's license is $150.00. Nonresident fur harvester's licenses shall not be sold or purchased before November 15 of each year. (2) (4) An individual who holds a fur harvester's license may hunt fur-bearing animals during the season open to taking fur-bearing animals with firearms and may trap fur-bearing animals during the season open to trapping fur-bearing animals. (3) (5) Beginning March 1, 2014, only Only an individual holding a valid base license is eligible to purchase a fur harvester's license, pursuant to in accordance with current regulations. The fee for a fur harvester's license is $15.00. $18.00. Beginning March 1, 2027, only an individual holding a valid fur harvester's license is eligible to purchase a bobcat kill tag. The fee for a bobcat kill tag is $18.00. (4) (6) Beginning March 1, 2014, for For a nonresident holding a valid base license and a valid fur harvester's license, the fur harvester's license is not valid for fur-bearing species for which a bag limit has been established. Sec. 43532. (1) An all-species fishing license entitles the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 licensee to take and possess all aquatic species as prescribed by law. (2) An individual 17 16 years of age or older shall not take or possess an aquatic species, except aquatic insects, in the waters over which this state has jurisdiction without an all-species fishing license. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the fee for a resident all-species fishing license is $25.00. $30.00. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the fee for a nonresident all-species fishing license is $75.00. $90.00. An individual under 17 16 years of age may take and possess aquatic species in the waters over which this state has jurisdiction without an all-species fishing license. However, an individual under 17 16 years of age may obtain an all-species fishing license. The fee for a resident or nonresident who is under 17 16 years of age for an all-species fishing license is $2.00. (3) The department shall develop an electronic license that allows an individual to display an electronic copy of his or her the individual's all-species fishing license using an electronic device. (4) The cold-water subaccount is created in the game and fish protection account. The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the subaccount. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the subaccount. The state treasurer shall credit to the subaccount interest and earnings from subaccount investments. Money in the subaccount at the close of the fiscal year remains in the subaccount and does not lapse to the game and fish protection account or the general fund. The department is the administrator of the subaccount for auditing purposes. The department shall expend money from the subaccount, on 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 appropriation, only for cold-water habitat improvement and monitoring, production, and dam removal to benefit cold-water species. (5) From the fees collected in subsection (2), the following amounts must be deposited in the cold-water subaccount created in subsection (4): (a) $5.00 from each resident all-species fishing license. (b) $15.00 from each nonresident all-species fishing license. Sec. 43532a. (1) The department shall charge an additional $1.00 $5.00 for each of the following licenses: (a) A base license issued under sections 43523a(3) and 43535(2). (b) A combination hunt and fish license issued under section 43523b. (c) Except for those licenses purchased by individuals under 17 16 years of age, an all-species fishing license issued under sections 43532(2) and 43536(1). (d) A complete license issued under section 43523b. (2) The department shall deposit money generated under this section in as follows: (a) $2.00 in the Michigan wildlife management public education subaccount created in section 43532b. (b) $2.00 in the hunting and fishing education and recruitment fund created in section 43553. (c) $1.00 in the hunters feeding Michigan fund created in section 43540c. Sec. 43533. (1) A resident or nonresident may purchase a 24-hour fishing license entitling that individual to take, for a designated 24-hour period, and possess all aquatic species as 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 prescribed by law. The fee for a resident 24-hour fishing license is $10.00 $15.00 per designated consecutive 24-hour period. (2) A resident or nonresident may purchase a 72-hour fishing license entitling that individual to take, for a designated 72-hour period, and possess all aquatic species as prescribed by law. The fee for a 72-hour fishing license is $30.00 per designated consecutive 72-hour period. (2) A nonresident may purchase a 24-hour fishing license entitling that individual to take, for a designated 24-hour period, and possess all aquatic species as prescribed by law. The fee for a nonresident 24-hour fishing license is $25.00 per designated consecutive 24-hour period. (3) Not later than March 1, 2018, the The department shall develop an electronic license that allows an individual to display an electronic copy of his or her the individual's 24-hour or 72-hour fishing license using an electronic device. Sec. 43535. (1) Until March 1, 2014, a resident of this state who is 65 years of age or older may obtain a senior small game license, a senior firearm deer license, a senior bow and arrow deer license, a senior bear hunting license, a senior wild turkey hunting license, or a senior fur harvester's license. The fee for each senior license shall be discounted 60% from the fee for the resident license. (2) Beginning March 1, 2014, a A resident of this state who is 65 years of age or older may obtain a senior base license, a senior deer license, a senior wild turkey hunting license, or a senior fur harvester's license. A resident of this state who is 16 years of age or younger may obtain a child base license, a child deer license, a child wild turkey hunting license, or a child fur 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 harvester's license. The fee for each senior or child license shall be discounted 60% from the fee for the resident license. Sec. 43540a. (1) Subject to subsection (4), by January 1, 2007, the department shall implement a program to distribute wild game to people in need. The program shall be known as the sportsmen against hunger hunters feeding Michigan program. (2) Under the program, the department shall do all of the following: (a) Collect donations of legally taken game that complies with all state and federal game laws, including any requirement that the parts of the game be intact. (b) Contract for processing the donated game. (c) Distribute the processed game to food banks, soup kitchens, and other charitable organizations that provide meals or food to people free of charge. (d) Promote the program through the license distribution system and other means that will further the mission of the program. (3) Under the program, the department may request financial donations to offset the cost of processing donated game. The financial donations are tax deductible. (4) The department may contract for the administration of the program by a nonprofit organization that is exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code, 26 USC 501, if the department determines that it is more efficient to do so. Subject to section 43540c(9), payments under the contract shall must be adequate to cover the nonprofit organization's costs in administering the program. Before entering such a contract, the department shall issue a request for proposals. If the request for 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 proposals does not yield a bid that meets the requirements of this section, the department is not required to implement the sportsmen against hunger hunters feeding Michigan program. (5) To qualify to enter a contract under subsection (4), a nonprofit organization must have demonstrated a commitment to the goals of the program and have at least 5 years of experience in providing wild game or other food to people free of charge. The contract shall must require that the contracting nonprofit organization do all of the following: (a) Maintain a license under the charitable organizations and solicitations act, 1975 PA 169, MCL 400.271 to 400.294. (b) Maintain adequate staff to perform the tasks outlined in the contract. (c) Annually undergo an independent financial audit and provide the audit information and report to the department. (6) As used in this section, "program" means the sportsmen against hunger hunters feeding Michigan program created under subsection (1). Sec. 43540c. (1) Subject to subsection (2), when a person applies for a license under this part, the department or the department's agent shall ask whether the person would like to donate $1.00 to the sportsmen against hunger hunters feeding Michigan program created by the department under section 43540a and, if so, shall collect the donation with the license fee. A person designated by the department to issue licenses shall not receive a commission under section 43541 for the donation. (2) Subsection (1) applies to license applications made beginning January 1, 2006. (3) A donation under subsection (1) is in addition to the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 license fee. (4) The department shall transfer donations under subsection (1) to the state treasurer for deposit in the fund. (5) The sportsmen against hunger hunters feeding Michigan fund is created within in the state treasury. (6) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the fund interest and earnings from fund investments. (7) Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year shall remain remains in the fund and shall does not lapse to the general fund. (8) Money The department shall expend money from the fund, shall be expended, upon on appropriation, only by the department for 1 or more of the following purposes: (a) The costs of administering the fund, including the costs of collecting donations to the fund. (b) The administration of the sportsmen against hunger hunters feeding Michigan program created under section 43540a, including, if applicable, the costs of any contract with a nonprofit organization to administer the sportsmen against hunger hunters feeding Michigan program, as authorized under section 43540a(4). (9) The department shall not incur costs described in subsection (8) in excess of the amount of revenue in the fund available to cover such costs. (10) As used in this section, "fund" means the sportsmen against hunger hunters feeding Michigan fund created in subsection (5). Sec. 43546. (1) Before June 1 By May 1 of each year, the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 department shall determine the total number of senior hunting and fishing qualified licenses issued and the total fees collected the preceding license year. The department shall determine the total fees that would have been collected if those senior citizens individuals had been required to purchase full-price resident hunting and fishing licenses during the preceding license year. From this total, the department shall subtract the fees collected from the sale of senior hunting and fishing qualified licenses during the preceding license year. The difference is the amount that would otherwise be collected. (2) The legislature By May 1 of each year, the department shall annually appropriate from the general fund a sum equal to notify the department of treasury, the senate fiscal agency, the house fiscal agency, and the state budget office of both of the following: (a) The amount of the fees that would otherwise be collected as determined pursuant to under subsection (1). The sum appropriated shall be credited to the game and fish protection account. (b) The amount of the fees and commissions retained under section 43541. (3) As used in this section, "qualified licenses" means any of the following: (a) A senior hunting and fishing license issued under section 43535 and 43536. (b) A child hunting and fishing license issued under section 43532 and 43535. (c) An antlerless deer license issued under section 43527a. (d) A free license issued to a disabled veteran under section 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 43537. (e) A free license issued to an active member of the military under section 43536a. Sec. 43553. (1) The department shall transmit all money received from the sale of licenses to the state treasurer, together with a statement indicating the amount of money received and the source of the money. (2) Except as provided in section 43555 and subsection (5), the state treasurer shall credit the money received from the sale of passbooks and licenses to the game and fish protection account. (3) Except as provided in sections 43524, 43525, 43525b, and 43554 and subsection (4), money credited to the game and fish protection account shall be paid out by the state treasurer pursuant to in accordance with the accounting laws of this state for the following purposes: (a) Services rendered by the department, together with the expenses incurred in the enforcement and administration of the wildlife and fisheries laws of the state, including the necessary equipment and apparatus incident to the operation and enforcement of the wildlife and fisheries laws, and the protection, propagation, distribution, and control of wildlife and fish. (b) The propagation and liberation of wildlife or fish and for their increase at the time, place, and manner as the department considers advisable. (c) The purchase, lease, and management of lands, together with the necessary equipment for the purpose of propagating and rearing wildlife or fish, and for establishing and maintaining game refuges, wildlife sanctuaries, and public shooting and fishing grounds. Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, not more 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 than 0.25% of the money credited to the game and fish protection account shall must be used to purchase lands under this subdivision. However, if all of the money appropriated from the natural resources trust fund for eco-region acquisition carried over from previous fiscal years is spent, then the 0.25% limitation under this subdivision does not apply. Land shall must not be purchased under this subdivision until that purchase is approved by the joint capital outlay subcommittee. The department shall primarily manage any land purchased or leased under this subdivision for 1 of the following purposes: (i) Propagating and rearing wildlife or fish. (ii) Maintaining game refuges, wildlife sanctuaries, and public shooting and fishing grounds. (d) Conducting investigations and compiling and publishing information relative to the propagation, protection, and conservation of wildlife. (e) Delivering lectures, developing cooperation, and carrying on appropriate educational activities relating to the conservation of the wildlife of this state. (4) The department may make direct grants to colleges and universities in this state, out of funds appropriated from the game and fish protection account, to conduct fish or wildlife research or both fish and wildlife research. (5) The youth hunting and fishing education and outreach recruitment fund is created as a separate fund in the department of treasury. Until March 1, 2014, the state treasurer shall credit to the youth hunting and fishing education and outreach fund the money received from the sale of small game licenses and all-species fishing licenses under sections 43523 and 43532, respectively, to 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 minor children. Beginning March 1, 2014, the state treasurer shall credit to the youth hunting and fishing education and outreach fund $1.00 received from the sale of each base license to minor children under section 43523a. Money in the youth hunting and fishing education and outreach recruitment fund at the close of the fiscal year shall remain remains in the fund and shall does not lapse to the general fund. (6) Money credited to the youth hunting and fishing education and outreach recruitment fund shall be paid out by the state treasurer pursuant to in accordance with the accounting laws of this state for as follows: (a) At least 50% for hunting and fishing education. and outreach programs for minor children. (b) The balance on hunting and fishing recruitment activities. (7) The department and any other executive department of the this state that receives money from the game and fish protection account or the youth hunting and fishing education and outreach recruitment fund shall submit an annual report to the legislature showing the amount of money received by the department or other executive department from the game and fish protection account or the youth hunting and fishing education and outreach recruitment fund and how that money was spent. An executive department required to submit a report as provided in this subsection shall send a copy of the report to the legislature and to the department. (8) Not later than November 1, 2013, the department shall complete and post on its website a fisheries division strategic and tactical plan with measures and metrics. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 277 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.